src/morphology/stems/pronouns.lexc
!! Pronouns
!  --------
!! Pronouns in the Sakirabiá language are references to things.

LEXICON Pronouns
õt+Pron+Prs+Sg1:õt    #   ;
ẽt+Pron+Prs+Sg2:ẽt    #   ;
te+Pron+Prs+Sg3:te    #   ;
sete+Pron+Prs+Sg3c:sete    #   ;
õt+Pron+Prs+Pl12:kise    #   ;
õt+Pron+Prs+Pl13:ose    #   ;
ẽt+Pron+Prs+Pl2:eyat    #   ;
te+Pron+Prs+Pl3:teyat    #   ;
sete+Pron+Prs+Pl3c:seteyat    #   ;

! vim: set ft=xfst-lexc:
